dictsource/ps_rules
.group ع
	ع	?       // Updated to glottal stop (?) which is more accurate than Q
	ع (_	?       // Updated to glottal stop
	_) ع (َ	?@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ع (ِ	?@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ع (ُ	?@      // Initial with damma
	ع (L02L02	?@      // Before consonant cluster
	ع (ع	?:      // Geminated
	ع (ا	?a:     // Common combinations
	ع (و	?u:
	ع (ی	?i:
	ع (ې	?e:
	ع (ۍ	?@i
	ع (ر	?r      // Consonant clusters
	ع (ل	?l
	ع (ن	?n
	ع (د	?d
	ع (ت	?t
	ع (س	?s
	ع (ش	?S
	ع (ک	?k
	ع (م	?m
	_) عام	?a:m      // Common/general
	_) عمر	?u'mur    // Age/life
	_) علم	?i'lm     // Knowledge/science
	_) عزت	?i'zat    // Honor/respect
	_) عقل	?a'qal    // Intellect/wisdom
	_) عادت	?a:'dat   // Habit/custom
	_) عذر	?u'zur    // Excuse/apology
	_) عدل	?a'dal    // Justice
	_) عشق	?i'Sq     // Love/passion
	_) عمل	?a'mal    // Action/deed
	_) عبادت	?iba:'dat // Worship
	_) عجیب	?a'dZi:b  // Strange/wonderful
	_) عاجز	?a:'dZiz  // Helpless/humble

.group غ
	غ	Q       // Updated to match ph_pashto
	غ (_	Q
	_) غ (َ	Q@      // Initial with fatha
	_) غ (ِ	Q@      // Initial with kasra
	_) غ (ُ	Q@      // Initial with damma
	غ (L02L02	Q@      // Before consonant cluster
	غ (غ	Q:      // Geminated
	غان	Qa:n    // Common ending
	غ (ر	Qr      // Common cluster
	غ (ل	Ql      // Common cluster
	غ (ا	Qa:     // Common combinations
	غ (و	Qu:
	غ (ی	Qi:
	غ (ې	Qe:
	غ (ۍ	Q@i
	غ (ن	Qn      // Consonant clusters
	غ (د	Qd
	غ (ت	Qt
	غ (س	Qs
	غ (ش	QS
	غ (ک	Qk
	غ (م	Qm
	غ (ړ	Qr.     // Specific to Pashto
	غ (ښ	QS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for غ using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) غلط	Qa'lat.      // Wrong (incorrect)
	_) غوښه	Qu'S.a       // Meat
	_) غر	Qar          // Mountain
	_) غاړه	Qa:'r.a      // Neck/collar
	_) غوږ	Qu:Z.        // Ear
	_) غږ	Q@Z          // Voice/sound
	_) غونډ	Qu:nd.       // Gathering/assembly
	_) غوا	Qwa:         // Cow
	_) غټ	Qat.         // Big/large
	_) غم	Qam          // Sorrow/grief
	_) غاښ	Qa:S.        // Tooth
	_) غوړ	Qur.         // Fat/oil
	_) غونډۍ	Qu:n'd.@i    // Hill/mound
	_) غورځول	Qur'dz@w@l   // To throw
	_) غوښتل	QuS.'t@l     // To want/request
.group ف
	ف	f
	ف (_	f
	_) ف (َ	f@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ف (ِ	f@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ف (ُ	f@      // Initial with damma
	ف (L02L02	f@      // Before consonant cluster
	ف (ف	f:      // Geminated
	ف (غ	f@'Qa:  // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ف (ر	fr      // Common cluster
	ف (ل	fl      // Common cluster
	ف (ا	fa:     // Common combinations
	ف (و	fu:
	ف (ی	fi:
	ف (ې	fe:
	ف (ۍ	f@i
	ف (ن	fn      // Consonant clusters
	ف (د	fd
	ف (ت	ft
	ف (س	fs
	ف (ش	fS
	ف (ک	fk
	ف (م	fm
	ف (ړ	fr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ف (ښ	fS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ف using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) فکر	fi'k@r       // Thought/idea
	_) فرش	fa'r@S       // Floor/carpet
	_) فصل	fa's@l       // Season/chapter
	_) فرمان	far'ma:n     // Order/command
	_) فوج	fu:dZ        // Army
	_) فیل	fi:l         // Elephant
	_) فارم	fa:rm        // Farm
	_) فلم	fi'l@m       // Film/movie
	_) فرق	fa'r@q       // Difference
	_) فیس	fi:s         // Fee
	_) فون	fo:n         // Phone
	_) فارسي	fa:r'si:     // Persian
	_) فضل	fa'z@l       // Grace/favor
	_) فتح	fa't@         // Victory/conquest
	_) فریاد	far'ja:d     // Cry/plea

.group ق
	ق	q
	ق (_	q
	_) ق (َ	q@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ق (ِ	q@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ق (ُ	q@      // Initial with damma
	ق (L02L02	q@      // Before consonant cluster
	ق (ق	q:      // Geminated
	ق (ر	qr      // Common cluster
	ق (ل	ql      // Common cluster
	ق (ا	qa:     // Common combinations
	ق (و	qu:
	ق (ی	qi:
	ق (ې	qe:
	ق (ۍ	q@i
	ق (ن	qn      // Consonant clusters
	ق (د	qd
	ق (ت	qt
	ق (س	qs
	ق (ش	qS
	ق (ک	qk
	ق (م	qm
	ق (ړ	qr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ق (ښ	qS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ق using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) قلم	qa'lam       // Pen
	_) قصه	qi'sa        // Story
	_) قانون	qa:'nu:n     // Law
	_) قدرت	qu'd@rat     // Power
	_) قبر	qa'b@r       // Grave
	_) قسم	qa'sam       // Oath/type
	_) قلعه	qa'la        // Fort/castle
	_) قرآن	qu'ra:n      // Quran
	_) قیمت	qi:'mat      // Price/value
	_) قاضي	qa:'zi:      // Judge
	_) قطار	qa'ta:r      // Line/row
	_) قوم	qo:m         // Nation/tribe
	_) قفل	qu'f@l       // Lock
	_) قربان	qur'ba:n     // Sacrifice
	_) قطره	qa't@ra      // Drop
.group ک
	ک	k
	ک (_	k
	کھ	k
	_) ک (َ	k@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ک (ِ	k@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ک (ُ	k@      // Initial with damma
	ک (L02L02	k@      // Before consonant cluster
	ک (ک	k:      // Geminated
	ک (ت	k@'t    // Common sequence
	ک (تان	k@'ta:n // Common ending
	ک (تاب	k@'ta:b // Common word part
	کوون	ko:w@n  // Added for compound word "زده_کوونکی"
	ک (ر	kr      // Common cluster
	ک (ل	kl      // Common cluster
	ک (ی	k@j     // Common ending
	ک (ا	ka:     // Common combinations
	ک (و	ku:
	ک (ې	ke:
	ک (ۍ	k@i
	ک (ن	kn      // Consonant clusters
	ک (د	kd
	ک (س	ks
	ک (ش	kS
	ک (م	km
	ک (ړ	kr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ک (ښ	kS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ک using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) کتاب	ki'ta:b      // Book
	_) کار	ka:r         // Work
	_) کور	ko:r         // Home
	_) کال	ka:l         // Year
	_) کلی	ku'l@j       // Village
	_) کوچنی	kutS'n@j     // Small/child
	_) کاغذ	ka:'Q@z      // Paper
	_) کلمه	ka'lima      // Word
	_) کمپیوټر	k@mpju:'t.@r  // Computer
	_) کرکټ	kri'k@t.     // Cricket
	_) کیسه	ki:'sa       // Story/tale
	_) کمره	ka'mra       // Camera
	_) کوټه	ko:'t.a      // Room
	_) کښې	k@'S.e:      // Inside
	_) کړه	k@'r.a       // Did (feminine)
.group ګ
	ګ	g
	ګ (_	g
	ګھ	g
	_) ګ (َ	g@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ګ (ِ	g@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ګ (ُ	g@      // Initial with damma
	ګ (L02L02	g@      // Before consonant cluster
	ګ (ګ	g:      // Geminated
	ګ (ر	g@'r    // Common sequence
	ګ (ړ	g@r.    // Common sequence
	ګ (ی	g@j     // Common ending
	ګ (ا	ga:     // Common combinations
	ګ (و	gu:
	ګ (ې	ge:
	ګ (ۍ	g@i
	ګ (ل	gl      // Consonant clusters
	ګ (ن	gn
	ګ (د	gd
	ګ (ت	gt
	ګ (س	gs
	ګ (ش	gS
	ګ (ک	gk
	ګ (م	gm
	ګ (ښ	gS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ګ using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) ګل	gul         // Flower
	_) ګرم	g@'r@m      // Hot/warm
	_) ګوته	go:'ta       // Finger
	_) ګړندی	g@r.'@n'd@j  // Fast
	_) ګاډی	ga:'d.@j     // Vehicle/car
	_) ګټه	ga't.a       // Benefit/profit
	_) ګڼه	ga'n.a       // Count/number
	_) ګډون	ga'd.o:n     // Participation
	_) ګومان	gu'ma:n      // Thought/opinion
	_) ګوښه	go:'S.a      // Corner/isolated
	_) ګیلاس	gi:'la:s     // Cherry/glass
	_) ګیډه	ge:'d.a      // Stomach/belly
	_) ګران	g@'ra:n      // Dear/expensive
.group ل
	ل	l
	ل (_	l
	_) ل (َ	l@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ل (ِ	l@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ل (ُ	l@      // Initial with damma
	ل (L02L02	l@      // Before consonant cluster
	ل (ل	l:      // Geminated
	ل (م	l@'m    // Common sequence
	ل (و	lw      // Common cluster
	ل (ی	l@j     // Common ending
	ل (ا	la:     // Common combinations
	ل (ې	le:
	ل (ۍ	l@i
	ل (ر	lr      // Consonant clusters
	ل (ن	ln
	ل (د	ld
	ل (ت	lt
	ل (س	ls
	ل (ش	lS
	ل (ک	lk
	ل (ګ	lg
	ل (ړ	lr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ل (ښ	lS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ل using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) لاس	la:s        // Hand
	_) لمر	l@'m@r      // Sun
	_) لوی	lo:j        // Big/large
	_) لږ	l@Z         // Little/few
	_) لار	la:r        // Path/way
	_) لوبه	lo:'ba       // Game/play
	_) لیک	li:k        // Writing/letter
	_) لوستل	lo:s't@l    // To read
	_) لرل	la'r@l      // To have
	_) لمبا	l@m'ba:     // Swimming
	_) لوړ	lo:r.        // High/tall
	_) لیدل	li:'d@l     // To see

.group م
	م	m
	م (_	m
	_) م (َ	m@      // Initial with fatha
	_) م (ِ	m@      // Initial with kasra
	_) م (ُ	m@      // Initial with damma
	م (L02L02	m@      // Before consonant cluster
	م (م	m:      // Geminated
	م (س	m@'s    // Common sequence
	م (سل	m@s@l   // Common sequence
	م (ر	mr      // Common cluster
	م (ل	ml      // Common cluster
	م (ی	m@j     // Common ending
	م (و	mw      // Common cluster
	م (ن	m@n     // Common sequence
	م (ا	ma:     // Common combinations
	م (ې	me:
	م (ۍ	m@i
	م (د	md      // Consonant clusters
	م (ت	mt
	م (ش	mS
	م (ک	mk
	م (ګ	mg
	م (ړ	mr.     // Specific to Pashto
	م (ښ	mS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for م using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) مور	mo:r        // Mother
	_) مور	mo:r        // Mother
	_) مینه	mi:'na       // Love
	_) مړ	m@r.         // Dead
	_) ماشوم	ma:'Su:m     // Child
	_) مځکه	m@'ts@ka     // Earth/ground
	_) مخ	m@X         // Face
	_) مرسته	m@r@s'ta    // Help
	_) مڼه	m@'n.a      // Apple
	_) ملګری	m@l'g@r@j   // Friend
	_) مات	ma:t        // Broken
	_) میاشت	mi:'a:St    // Month
	_) مچ	m@tS        // Kiss/fly
.group ن
	ن	n
	ن (_	n
	_) ن (َ	n@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ن (ِ	n@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ن (ُ	n@      // Initial with damma
	ن (L02L02	n@      // Before consonant cluster
	ن (ن	n:      // Geminated
	ن (س	n@s     // Common sequence
	ن (ستان	n@s'ta:n // Common ending
	ن (ر	nr      // Common cluster
	ن (ی	n@j     // Common ending
	ن (ه	n@      // Before he
	ن (ا	na:     // Common combinations
	ن (و	nu:
	ن (ې	ne:
	ن (ۍ	n@i
	ن (ل	nl      // Consonant clusters
	ن (د	nd
	ن (ت	nt
	ن (س	ns
	ن (ش	nS
	ن (ک	nk
	ن (ګ	ng
	ن (م	nm
	ن (ړ	nr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ن (ښ	nS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ن using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) نن	n@n         // Today
	_) نوم	no:m        // Name
	_) نړۍ	n@'r.@i     // World
	_) نوی	n@'w@j      // New
	_) ناست	na:st       // Sitting
	_) نیول	ni:'w@l     // To catch/take
	_) نمر	n@'m@r      // Sun
	_) نښه	n@'S.a      // Sign/mark
	_) نږدې	n@Z'de:     // Near/close
	_) نظر	na'z@r      // Opinion/view
	_) نغمه	n@Q'ma      // Melody/song
	_) نمونه	n@mu:'na    // Example/sample

.group ڼ
	ڼ	n.
	ڼ (_	n.
	_) ڼ (َ	n.@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ڼ (ِ	n.@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ڼ (ُ	n.@     // Initial with damma
	ڼ (L02L02	n.@     // Before consonant cluster
	ڼ (ڼ	n.:     // Geminated
	ڼ (ی	n.@j    // Common ending
	ڼ (ا	n.a:    // Common combinations
	ڼ (و	n.u:
	ڼ (ې	n.e:
	ڼ (ۍ	n.@i
	ڼ (ر	n.r     // Consonant clusters
	ڼ (ل	n.l
	ڼ (د	n.d
	ڼ (ت	n.t
	ڼ (س	n.s
	ڼ (ش	n.S
	ڼ (ک	n.k
	ڼ (ګ	n.g
	ڼ (م	n.m
	ڼ (ړ	n.r.    // Specific to Pashto
	ڼ (ښ	n.S.    // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ڼ using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) ڼڼ	n.:         // Retroflex nasal geminate
	_) ڼه	n.@         // Retroflex nasal with he
	_) ڼۍ	n.@i        // Retroflex nasal with ye
	_) ڼګ	n.@g        // Retroflex nasal with gaf
	_) ڼډ	n.@d.       // Retroflex nasal with retroflex d
	_) ڼټ	n.@t.       // Retroflex nasal with retroflex t
	_) ڼړ	n.@r.       // Retroflex nasal with retroflex r
	_) ڼښ	n.@S.       // Retroflex nasal with retroflex sh
	_) ڼکی	n.@'k@j     // Retroflex nasal with kaf and ye
	_) ڼګی	n.@'g@j     // Retroflex nasal with gaf and ye
	_) ڼوال	n.@'wa:l    // Retroflex nasal with waw and lam
	_) ڼیز	n.@'ji:z    // Retroflex nasal with ye and ze
